Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership in the System

47-23-40.
Eligibility.

Any person who on June 30, 1998, was an active, inactive, or retired member of a predecessor retirement system shall be transferred to this retirement system in the same status effective July 1, 1998. Any person who on June 30, 1998, was a beneficiary of a predecessor retirement system shall become a beneficiary of this retirement system in the same status effective July 1, 1998; provided, however, that, except as otherwise expressly provided, the benefits of any beneficiary so transferred shall continue to be calculated as such benefits were calculated on June 30, 1998.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-41.
Employee contributions.

Any person who becomes a superior court judge, a judge or solicitor-general of a state court, a juvenile court judge, or a district attorney on or after July 1, 1998, shall be a member of this retirement system and shall make employee contributions into the fund. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a person who elected membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to Code Section 47-2-260.

No juvenile court judge who also serves as a judge or solicitor-general of a state court shall be eligible to obtain separate service under this chapter for each position held, and such service shall be combined for the purposes of this chapter. Any person holding two such positions shall make employee contributions under this chapter on the basis of the compensation received for both such positions, and the compensation received for both such positions shall be combined for all purposes under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-42.
Judges and solicitors-general of state courts ineligible.

Judges and solicitors-general of state courts who are members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to Code Section 47-2-290 shall not be eligible to become members of this retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-43.
Preservation of prior rights under this Code section by certain attorneys employed by Legislative Counsel or Department of Law.

Any person employed pursuant to Code Section 28-4-3 or 45-15-31 who was subject to the former provisions of this Code section as such existed on June 30, 2005, shall retain all rights and obligations as existed on that day. Such persons shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter applicable to solicitors-general of the state courts. Employer contributions shall be paid by the respective employers under such Code sections.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 57, § 1/HB 492; Ga. L. 2009, p. 315, § 1/HB 210; Ga. L. 2011, p. 504, § 1/HB 144.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “employed pursuant to Code Section 28-4-3 or 45-15-31” near the beginning of the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2011 amendment,

effective May 11, 2011, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct this title, in the first sentence, inserted “who was”, inserted “former” near the beginning, inserted “as such existed” near the middle, and substituted “existed” for “exist” near the end.

Editor’s notes.

The persons subject to provisions of this Code section as it existed on June 30, 2005, included certain attorneys employed by the Office of Legislative Counsel pursuant to Code Section 28-4-3 and by the Department of Law pursuant to Code Section 45-15-31.
For provisions of this Code section that were in effect on June 30, 2005, see Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1, as amended by Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-23-43.1.
Membership for persons employed by the Office of Legislative Counsel in full-time positions requiring admission to State Bar of Georgia.

On and after July 1, 2020, each individual employed pursuant to Code Section 28-4-3 in a full-time position requiring admission to and good standing with the State Bar of Georgia as a condition of employment shall become a member of this retirement system; provided, however, that each individual so employed as of June 30, 2020, who is not already a member of this retirement system shall remain a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia unless he or she elects to become a member of this retirement system on or before June 30, 2021, notifies the board of such election, and pays to the retirement system the remaining amount necessary to pay for the full actuarial cost to the retirement system associated with his or her transfer of service. Upon such election and payment, such an individual shall become a member of this retirement system, the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall transfer to this retirement system all employer and employee contributions paid by or on behalf of him or her together with regular interest thereon, and he or she shall receive service in this retirement system toward vesting only in the full amount of the service he or she rendered as an employee while he or she was a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and for which credit was allowable in such system.

This Code section shall only apply to or affect individuals who are employed on or after July 1, 2020, pursuant to Code Section 28-4-3 in a full-time position requiring admission to and good standing with the State Bar of Georgia as a condition of employment. Members of this retirement system who are so employed shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter applicable to solicitors-general of the state courts, except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter. For the purposes of this retirement system, for each such member, his or her earnable monthly compensation shall be the full rate of regular monthly compensation paid from state funds to such member employee for his or her full working time.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-43.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 46, § 1/HB 664.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2020.

47-23-44.
Members receiving benefits from predecessor retirement systems; creditable service with other systems.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply only to persons who become members or beneficiaries of this retirement system by operation of Code Section 47-23-40.

Any beneficiary of this retirement system subject to the provisions of this Code section who on June 30, 1998, was receiving a benefit from two predecessor retirement systems shall continue to receive both such benefits from this retirement system as if he or she were a beneficiary of two retirement systems.

Any member subject to this Code section who on June 30, 1998, is receiving a retirement benefit from one predecessor retirement system and is an active member of another predecessor retirement system shall continue to receive such retirement benefit from this retirement system and shall continue as an active member of this retirement system. Upon complying with all conditions precedent to receiving a benefit under this retirement system, such member shall be entitled to receive both such benefits in the same manner as if he or she were a member of two separate retirement systems.

Any member subject to the provisions of this Code section who on June 30, 1998, has ten or more years of creditable service in one predecessor retirement system but has not yet begun receiving a retirement benefit and who on such date was an active member of another predecessor retirement system may:

Continue his or her status in this retirement system as if he or she were a member of two retirement systems, and upon retirement his or her retirement benefits in both capacities shall be calculated as provided under this retirement system; or

Combine the years of service under the predecessor retirement system with his or her years of service under this retirement system as provided in Code Section 47-23-45.

As used in this subsection, the term “category of covered position” means service as:

A judge of the superior courts;

A judge or solicitor-general of a state court or a juvenile court judge; or

A district attorney.

Any member subject to the provisions of this Code section who after June 30, 1998, obtains ten or more years of service in one category of covered positions and who subsequently becomes employed in another category of covered position may, at his or her option:

Consider himself or herself vested in a retirement benefit in the initial position and begin accruing service in the subsequent position as if he or she were a member of two retirement systems; or

Combine the years of service under this retirement system as provided in Code Section 47-23-45.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-45.
Effect of change in employment.

Any member of this retirement system shall be entitled to remain as a member by holding any position or office covered by the fund and shall receive full credit for all service as a member despite his or her change from one position or office to another covered by the fund. Upon becoming eligible for retirement, however, retirement benefits shall be determined in accordance with Code Sections 47-23-101 and 47-23-102.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-46.
Members from District Attorneys’ Retirement System.

Any member who on June 30, 1998, was entitled to remain a member of the District Attorneys’ Retirement System while employed in a position covered by Chapter 2 of this title pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 47-13-40.1, as such Code section appeared on June 30, 1998, shall have the same privileges with regard to this retirement system. This Code section shall not apply to any other member of this retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1697, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 61/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former subsection (a) designation and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Any person who became a member of this retirement system pursuant to the operation of Code Section 47-23-40 and who, prior to becoming a member of a predecessor retirement system, was a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia may elect to transfer his or her membership from this retirement system to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Any person desiring to transfer membership shall notify the board of this retirement system and the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia not later than December 31, 2000. Upon receipt of such notice, the board of trustees of this retirement system shall transfer to the board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia all employer and employee contributions paid by or on behalf of such member, together with regular interest thereon.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-23-47.
Transfer of members’ contributions.

The board of trustees shall transfer to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia all contributions made to the fund by a member who transfers to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia; and The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of Juvenile Court Judges, and the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, as appropriate, are authorized and directed to pay from the funds appropriated or otherwise available an additional amount equal to the 5 percent contribution of such member plus an additional 20 percent of the contribution, so that the state contribution shall be in accordance with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 16/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the middle, substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of State Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of Juvenile Court Judges, and the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, as appropriate, are” for “commissioner of administrative services is” and substituted “or otherwise available” for “for the operating expenses of the superior courts of this state”.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, The Council of State Court Judges of Georgia” for “the Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia, the Council of State Court Judges of Georgia” in the middle.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-23-48.
Election of retirement system; effect of subsequent legislation.

Any member of this retirement system who is vested for a normal retirement benefit who without a break in service becomes the head of a state department or agency or who is appointed by the Governor to a full-time salaried position on a state board or commission may make a one time irrevocable election to remain a member of this retirement system, in which event the employer and employee shall make all contributions to this retirement system and perform such other acts as are required by law or regulation.

This subsection shall be applicable to each person who was a member of this retirement system on July 1, 2000, and to any person who becomes a member after that date. Any person eligible to make the election provided for in this subsection shall do so in writing to the board of trustees of this retirement system and the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia not later than September 30, 2000, or within 60 days after the date he or she became employed in a position which would otherwise obligate him or her to become a member of this retirement system, whichever date is later. Once made, the election is irrevocable.

Any person subject to this subsection who elects to become a member of this retirement system may have accumulated contributions under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia transferred to this retirement system. The board of trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system all employer and employee contributions made by or on behalf of the member, together with regular interest. The member shall be granted only so much creditable service as such amount will warrant without creating any accrued actuarial unfunded liability as to this retirement system; provided, however, that such service credits shall not be used in determining the qualifications of a member for benefits other than vested rights or disability, death, or normal service retirement allowances.

The provisions of this Code section shall not become a part of the employment contract and shall be subject to subsequent legislation; provided, however, that no person who has made the election provided by this Code section shall be affected by any subsequent legislation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1693, § 2.

47-23-49.
Membership for full-time judges of the state-wide business court; creditable service.

On and after July 1, 2020, each individual employed full time as a judge in the state-wide business court established pursuant to Article VI of the Constitution shall become a member of this retirement system.

Each individual who became a member of this retirement system on July 1, 2020, pursuant to this Code section, shall be entitled to creditable service in this retirement system for his or her service rendered between January 1, 2020, and June 30, 2020, as a full-time judge in the state-wide business court established pursuant to Article VI of the Constitution, provided that he or she pays to the retirement system within one year the total of the employee contributions that he or she would have made during such period if he or she had been a member pursuant to this Code section.

Each individual who becomes a member of this retirement system pursuant to this Code section shall be eligible to transfer his or her creditable service from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system, provided that he or she notifies the board of such election within one year of obtaining such membership and pays to the retirement system the remaining amount necessary to pay for the full actuarial cost to the retirement system associated with his or her transfer of service. Upon such election and payment, the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall transfer to this retirement system all employer and employee contributions paid by or on behalf of him or her together with regular interest thereon, and he or she shall receive service in this retirement system toward vesting only in the full amount of the service he or she rendered as an employee while he or she was a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and for which credit was allowable in such system.

An individual who becomes a member of this retirement system pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter applicable to solicitors-general of the state courts, except as otherwise specifically provided by this chapter. For the purposes of this retirement system, for each such member, his or her earnable monthly compensation shall be the full rate of regular monthly compensation paid from state funds to such member employee for his or her full working time.

All other individuals employed by the state-wide business court established pursuant to Article VI of the Constitution shall be treated in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 47-2-70.1 for new state agencies.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 14, § 1/HB 663.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-23-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1696, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

This Code section, which was reserved, formerly pertained to irrevocable election by individuals employed but previously ineligible and creditable service. This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-23-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1696, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 62, effective July 1, 2010.

47-23-50.
Retirement options for state judges serving Fulton County.

Any person who becomes a judge of the State Court of Fulton County on or after July 1, 2004, shall become a member of this retirement system by operation of law and shall not be a member of any other public retirement system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 573, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 46, § 1/HB 178; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 63/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former subsection (a) designation and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Any person serving as a judge of the State Court of Fulton County on June 30, 2004, may make an irrevocable election to become a member of this retirement system by so notifying the board of trustees not later than December 31, 2004.
The local retirement system of which such person is a member shall transfer to this retirement system all employer and employee contributions paid by or on behalf of any such member with regular interest thereon.
Such member shall receive only such creditable service, not to exceed the actual years of creditable service, as that amount will warrant without creating any accrued actuarial liability to this retirement system, calculated as if the member had either elected or rejected spouses’ survivors benefits at the member’s option. Such persons shall be subject to all provisions of this chapter.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”